North Carolina statutes. Chapter 87. Contractors.
Article 2. Plumbing and Heating Contractors.
§ 87-27.
License fees payable in advance; application of.

All license fees shall be paid in advance to the secretary and treasurer of the Board and by him held as a fund for the use of the Board. The compensation and expenses of the members of the Board as herein provided, the salaries of its employees, the costs of continuing educational programs for licensees and applicants, and all expenses incurred in the discharge of its duties under this Article shall be paid out of such fund, upon the warrant of the chairman and secretary and treasurer.

History.

1931, c. 52, s. 13; 1933, c. 57; 1939, c. 224, s. 9; 1953, c. 254, s. 3; 1959, c. 865, s. 1; 1979, c. 834, s. 10.

§ 87-27.1.
Public awareness program.

The Board shall establish and implement a public awareness program to inform the general public of the purpose and function of the Board.

History.

1979, c. 834, s. 11.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 administrative law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1185 (1980).